Georgia, session 2025_26, SB369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 31 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the "Charter
Schools Act of 1998," is amended in Code Section 20-2-2062, relating to definitions, by
adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
"(3.3)(A) 'Completion charter school' means a charter school that serves students in any
of grades six through 12 and provides:
(i) Special education services as provided for in Code Section 20-2-152;
S. B. 369
- 1 -

LC 49 2344
(ii) Remedial education program services as provided for in Code Section 20-2-154;
and
(iii) Nontraditional education programs and services, including, but not limited to:
(I) Dropout prevention and academic intervention programs;
(II) Programs for high school credit recovery; and
(III) Opportunities for students to schedule classes outside of the traditional school
day, school week, and school year.
(B) Such term shall not include a school that serves students in any of grades
kindergarten through five."
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended in Code Section 20-2-2063, relating to charter petitions, by
adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(e)(1) The State Board of Education shall establish rules, regulations, policies, and
procedures to govern the contents of a charter petition for a completion charter school.
(2) The State Board of Education shall establish rules, regulations, policies, and
procedures to provide for charter petitions for a completion charter school. Such rules,
regulations, policies, and procedures shall require that a charter petition and the charter
contain an explanation of:
(A) The special education services to be provided pursuant to Code Section 20-2-152,
the remedial education program services to be provided pursuant to Code Section
20-2-154, and other nontraditional education programs and services to be provided; and
(B) The measurable objective performance standards in the areas of academic
achievement, student growth, and student retention that will be established, monitored,
evaluated, and reported.
(3) The State Board of Education shall establish rules, regulations, policies, and
procedures to provide for an existing charter school to convert its current charter to a
S. B. 369
- 2 -

LC 49 2344
completion charter school charter, which shall be subject to the initial term restriction
provided for in subsection (b) of Code Section 20-2-2067.1."
SECTION 3.
Said article is further amended in Code Section 20-2-2063.3, relating to code of principles
and standards for charter school authorizers, by revising subsection (a) as follows:
"(a)(1) The State Board of Education and the State Charter Schools Commission shall
jointly establish a code of principles and standards of charter school authorizing to guide
local boards of education, the state board, and the State Charter Schools Commission in
meeting high-quality authorizing practices. The principles and standards established by
the state board and the State Charter Schools Commission shall, as applicable, include:
(1)(A) Maintaining high standards for approving charter petitions;
(2)(B) Establishing high academic, financial, and operational performance standards
for charter schools;
(3)(C) Annually monitoring, evaluating, and reporting charter school progress in
meeting academic, financial, and operational performance standards, including ensuring
that a local school system has not been designated as a high-risk local school system
by the Department of Audits and Accounts pursuant to Code Section 20-2-67, or if it
has been designated as a high-risk local school system, that it has a written corrective
action plan in place and that local school system board members and appropriate
personnel participate in required training to address the deficiencies;
(4)(D) Upholding charter school autonomy in school governance, instructional
program implementation, personnel, and budgeting;
(5)(E) Protecting students and holding charter schools accountable for their obligations
to all students; and
(6)(F) Protecting the public interest and holding charter schools accountable for their
obligations of governance, management, and oversight of public funds.
S. B. 369
- 3 -

LC 49 2344
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of paragraph (1) of this subsection to the contrary, the
principles and standards established by the state board and the State Charter Schools
Commission shall establish separate principles and standards for completion charter
schools, which may include the same or similar principles and standards provided for in
paragraph (1) of this subsection, but which shall include provisions for:
(A) Establishing measurable objective performance standards in the areas of academic
achievement, student growth, and student retention; and
(B) Monitoring, evaluating, and reporting progress in meeting such performance
standards."
SECTION 4.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 369
- 4 -